RHVoiceCore/RHVoice/src/scripts/Belarusian/tok.foma
# Copyright (C) 2025,  Zvonimir Stanecic <zvonimirek222@yandex.com>

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU Lesser General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

define Consonant 
б|г|ґ|д|ж|з|к|л|м|н|п|р|с|т|ф|х|ц|ч|ш|щ|й|в|ў|Б|Г|Ґ|Д|Ж|З|К|Л|М|Н|П|Р|С|Т|Ф|Х|Ц|Ч|Ш|Щ|Й|В|Ў| 
b|c|ć|d|f|g|h|j|k|l|ł|m|n|ń|p|r|s|ś|t|q|v|w|x|z|ż|ź|ž| 
B|C|Ć|D|F|G|H|J|K|L|Ł|M|N|Ń|P|R|S|Ś|T|Q|V|W|X|Z|Ż|Ź|Ž ; 

define Vowel 
а|е|э|и|ы|і|о|у|ю|я|ё|А|Е|Э|И|Ы|І|О|У|Ю|Я|Ё | 
a|e|i|o|ó|u|y | 
A|E|I|O|Ó|U|Y ; 

define Letter 
Consonant|Vowel|ь|Ь|ъ|Ъ ; 

define Apos %'|’|‘|ʼ ; 

source stress_in_text.foma

define Word 
[Letter | WrittenStressedVowel]+ [Apos [Letter | WrittenStressedVowel]+]*;

define NZDigit 1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9;
define Digit %0|NZDigit;

define Number %0 | [NZDigit Digit*];

define ConsonantSequence 
Consonant+ - [в|В|з|З|й|Й|б|Б|ж|Ж|к|К|ў|Ў|{ўс}];

define LetterSequence 
ConsonantSequence | [ъ|Ъ]+ ; 

define BasicTokenizer 
Word @-> ... word || _ ,, 
NZDigit Digit* @-> ... num ,, 
%0 Digit+ @-> ... dig ,, 
%0 @-> ... num ,, 
\[Letter | Digit] @-> ... sym ; 

define TagLetterSequences 
word -> lseq || [.#.|word|num|dig|sym] LetterSequence _ ; 

define TagSpecial 
word @-> lseq || .#. [ь|Ь]+ _ .#. ; 

define UntagLargeNumbers 
num -> dig || Digit^16 _ ; 

define JoinPlusOrMinus 
[%+|%-] [sym:0] -> || .#.|sym _ Digit+ num ; 

define JoinAfterNumberSymbols 
[num:0] [%%|%°] [sym:num] -> ; 

regex 
BasicTokenizer .o. 
TagLetterSequences .o. 
TagSpecial .o. 
UntagLargeNumbers .o. 
JoinPlusOrMinus .o. 
JoinAfterNumberSymbols ; 
